Louisiana, session 2026, HB382.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:802(D)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§802. Powers and duties; Office of Group Benefits
* * *
D.
* * *
(2) Additionally, any adjustments to such contracts in the amount of one
million dollars or more shall require the review and approval of the oversight
committees Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget before the modified contracts
may be implemented. Such adjustments shall indicate the fiscal impact to the plan
of benefits as well as the rate structure, if any, over the subsequent three years or
maximum contract period.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.